Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.050

Habeas corpus available to defendant.

The defendant may have the same remedy by writ of habeas corpus as in other cases of arrest and bail.

[Code 1881 s 641; 1877 p 134 s 644; 1869 p 150 s 581; 1854 p 210 s 423; RRS s 782.]